Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.510

Document filed when received—Register—Inspection of register, information, etc.

A document is filed with the director when it is received by the director or by a person as the director designates by rule or order. The director or the director's designee shall keep a register of all applications for registration and registration statements which are or have ever been effective under this chapter and all denial, suspension, or revocation orders which have ever been entered under this chapter. The register shall be open for public inspection. The information contained in or filed with any registration statement, application, or report may be made available to the public under such rules as the director prescribes.

[ 1994 c 256 s 25; 1959 c 282 s 51.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.